California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(4) The number of clients served.

(5) The types of services provided and in what language or languages.

(6) The regions served.

(7) The ethnic communities served.

(8) The identification of further barriers and challenges to the provision of services described in subdivision (b).

(f) In accordance with Section 1621(d) of Title 8 of the United States Code, this section provides services for undocumented persons.

(g) The sum of twenty million dollars ($20,000,000) is hereby appropriated to the Department of Social Services in the 2017–18 fiscal year for immigration services funding to be available for payment to existing entities under contract pursuant to this section for work on behalf of clients involved in, applying for, or subject to federal Deferred Action for Childhood Arrivals status.

(h) Notwithstanding any other law, payments shall be made by the Controller to existing entities under contract pursuant to this chapter upon receipt of written notification from the State Department of Social Services of the amounts, contractors, and timing of the payments.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 43, Sec. 66.   (AB 120)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

13304.

(a) Any grant awarded pursuant to Section 13303 shall fulfill all of the following:

(1) Be executed only with a nonprofit organization that meets the requirements set forth either in Section 501(c)(3) or 501(c)(5) of the Internal Revenue Code or in Section 23701d of the Revenue and Taxation Code and that meets all of the following requirements:

(A) Except as provided in clause (i) of subparagraph (D), have at least three years of experience handling the type of immigration issues for which the organization is requesting a grant.

(B) Have conducted trainings on immigration issues for persons beyond its staff.

(C) Is recognized and accredited by the Recognition and Accreditation Program under the United States Department of Justice’s Executive Office for Immigration Review or meets the requirements to receive funding from the Trust Fund Program administered by the State Bar of California.

(D) (i) For a legal services organization that provides legal training and technical assistance as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 13303, have at least 10 years of experience conducting immigration legal services and technical assistance and meet the requirements to receive funding from the Trust Fund Program administered by the State Bar of California.

(ii) Notwithstanding clause (i), a legal services organization, as
 described in clause (i), may, at the discretion of the department, instead meet the requirements listed in subparagraphs (A) and (B).

(2) Require reporting, monitoring, or audits of services provided, as determined by the department.

(3) Require grant recipients to maintain adequate legal malpractice insurance and to indemnify and hold the state harmless from any claims that arise from the legal services provided pursuant to this chapter.

(b) For grants awarded prior to the effective date of the act that added this subdivision, with the consent of the department and the grantee, the grantee may provide any of the services described in Section 13303, as amended by that act, and any agreement between the department and grantee shall be deemed to authorize the provision of those
 services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 26, Sec. 24.   (AB 152)   Effective June 29, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

13305.

(a) Subject to the availability of funding in the act that added this section or the annual Budget Act, the department shall provide grants to organizations qualified under Section 13306 to provide free education and outreach information, services, and materials about services provided pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 13303.

(b) For purposes of this section, “education and outreach” activities means the dissemination of information or activities that promote the benefits of citizenship or immigration remedies, and explain eligibility to prospective United States citizens or prospective individuals eligible for deferred action, or explain to individuals their immigration-related rights.

(1) Education and outreach activities shall include referrals to educational or legal services that support the applicants’ eligibility for citizenship, deferred action, or other immigration remedies, and the importance of participating in civic engagement as a naturalized citizen.

(2) Education and outreach activities do not include representation as legal counsel that would assist in the application process for a prospective citizen or prospective individual eligible for deferred action or other immigration remedies.

(c) No more than 40 percent of grant funds awarded to an organization qualified under Section 13306 shall be advanced to that organization.

(d) The department shall update the Legislature on the following information in the course of budget hearings:

(1) The timeline for implementation of this section.

(2) The participating organizations awarded contracts or grants.

(3) The number of applications submitted.

(4) The number of clients served.

(5) The types of services provided and in what language or languages.

(6) The regions served.

(7) The identification of further barriers and challenges to education, outreach, immigration assistance, and legal services related to naturalization and deferred action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 26, Sec. 25.   (AB 152)   Effective June 29, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

13306.

(a) Grants awarded pursuant to Section 13305 shall be provided only to nonprofit organizations that meet the requirements set forth either in Section 501(c)(3) or 501(c)(5) of the Internal Revenue Code or in Section 23701d of the Revenue and Taxation Code and have at least three years of experience with both of the following:

(1) Conducting education and outreach with immigrant populations.

(2) Conducting outreach for government benefits and programs.

(b) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2016.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 451, Sec. 4.   (AB 1318)   Effective October 7, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

13307.

The department may transfer funds appropriated for the purposes of this chapter among services described in this chapter in response to the results of requests for applications received or to changing state or federal law. Following the award of funding pursuant to this section, the department shall provide written notification to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee of the items specified in subdivision (e) of Section 13303. Subsequent to this notification, and in addition to the update required by subdivision (e) of Section 13303, the department shall provide written notification to the Department of Finance and the Joint Legislative Budget Committee no less than 30 days prior to either of the following, unless a shorter timeframe is requested by the department due to emergent circumstances:

(a) Any proposed changes that adjust the aggregate amount awarded for any particular service described in subdivision (b) of Section 13303 by more than 15 percent.

(b) For any proposed transfers of funding between the purposes of Sections 13300 and 13303.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 24, Sec. 43.   (SB 89)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

13308.

The provisions of this chapter are severable. If any provision of this chapter or its application is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 24, Sec. 44.   (SB 89)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

13310.

A county shall make its best efforts to provide an undocumented minor or nonminor dependent in foster care under the jurisdiction of the juvenile court with access to immigration legal services. This access may be provided by the child welfare agency through outside legal service providers.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 528, Sec. 3.   (AB 829)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5.7. Rapid Response Program [13400. - 13408.]

13400.

The State Department of Social Services shall administer a rapid response program to award grants or contracts to entities that provide critical assistance to immigrants during times of need.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 27, Sec. 96.   (SB 80)   Effective June 27, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

13401.

(a) Grants or contracts awarded by the State Department of Social Services pursuant to this chapter shall comply with all of the following:

(1) May be executed with entities, including, but not limited to, nonprofit entities that meet the requirements set forth in either Section 501(c)(3) or 501(c)(5) of the Internal Revenue Code or in Section 23701d of the Revenue and Taxation Code. An entity may partner with another entity to meet the requirements of this paragraph.

(2) Shall require reporting, monitoring, or audits of assistance provided, as determined by the department.

(3) Shall be used to deliver the following critical assistance to immigrants, as determined necessary by the department:

(A) Medical screening and treatment needs identified by that screening.

(B) (i) Temporary shelter that meets minimum habitability standards, including access to a bathroom, shower, and safe sleeping space. The entity may provide this assistance through temporary direct housing support, rental of physical space or hotel rooms, or by operating a shelter.

(ii) For purposes of this paragraph, shelter operations include, but are not limited to, any of the following:

(I) Securing physical space and making any
 necessary modifications to that space as required by a fire marshal or other legal authority.

(II) Personnel to oversee the shelter, including security officers.

(III) Janitorial services.

(IV) Laundry services.

(V) Insurance.

(VI) Any other associated and necessary costs of operating a shelter.

(C) Food.

(D) Clothing and other essential supplies.

(E) Transportation.

(F) Communications, including telephone and internet access, and translation services.

(G) Outreach and case management to support the delivery of the services listed in this paragraph.

(4) An entity that is awarded a grant or contract to provide medical screening shall have at least three years of experience providing medical screenings or other equivalent health care related services.

(5) An entity that is awarded a grant or contract to provide assistance other than medical services shall have at least three years of experience providing the assistance for which the entity seeks funding or shall subcontract with another entity that has at least three years of experience providing those services.

(6) An entity that is awarded a grant or contract pursuant to paragraph (5) to provide medical screenings may subcontract with another entity that has at least three years of experience providing medical screenings or other equivalent health care related services.

(b) Not more than 40 percent of each grant or contract awarded to an entity shall be advanced to that entity.

(c) Funding pursuant to this chapter shall be coordinated with any other funds available to support immigrants with critical assistance, and shall supplement and not supplant those funds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 451, Sec. 5.   (AB 1318)   Effective October 7, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

13402.

The State Department of Social Services shall provide an update to the Legislature in the course of the annual budget process regarding any entity receiving funds pursuant to this chapter. The update shall reflect the following information:

(a) The name of the entity or entities that will be awarded a grant or contract.

(b) The timeline for implementation of the services.

(c) The approximate number of persons that will be served per month by the grant or contract funds.

(d) The type of assistance that will be provided to immigrants.

(e) Identification of any additional barriers and challenges to assist immigrants.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 27, Sec. 96.   (SB 80)   Effective June 27, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

13403.

The Legislature finds and declares that this chapter is a state law that provides assistance and services for undocumented persons within the meaning of Section 1621(d) of Title 8 of the United States Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 27, Sec. 96.   (SB 80)   Effective June 27, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

13404.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, funding awarded pursuant to this chapter shall be exempt from the personal services contracting requirements of Article 4 (commencing with Section 19130) of Chapter 5 of Part 2 of Division 5 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, funding awarded pursuant to this chapter shall be exempt from the Public Contract Code and the State Contracting Manual, and shall not be subject to the approval of the Department of General Services.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 27, Sec. 96.   (SB 80)   Effective June 27, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

13405.

Notwithstanding any other law, any personally identifiable information, including name, birth date, and destination address, as well as shelter location, shall be subject to the requirements of Section 10850 and shall be exempt from inspection under the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 28, Sec. 160.   (SB 1380)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

13406.

The state shall be immune from any liability resulting from the implementation of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 27, Sec. 96.   (SB 80)   Effective June 27, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

13407.

Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the State Department of Social Services may implement, interpret, or make specific this chapter without taking any regulatory action.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 27, Sec. 96.   (SB 80)   Effective June 27, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

13408.

The provisions of this chapter are severable. If any provision of this chapter or its application is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 27, Sec. 96.   (SB 80)   Effective June 27, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5.8. Disaster Relief Grants [13600. - 13601.]

13600.

(a) The State Department of Social Services may provide state supplemental grants to meet disaster-related necessary expenses or serious needs of individuals and households adversely affected by any disaster declared by the President of the United States in those cases where individuals and households are unable to meet those expenses or needs through assistance under Section 408 of the Robert T. Stafford Disaster Relief and Emergency Assistance Act (P.L. 93-288, as amended by P.L. 106-390 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 5174)), or from other sources.

(b) Grants shall only be made to individuals and households determined to be eligible for the federal assistance to individuals and households program under Section 5174 of Title 42 of the United States Code and who still have unmet serious needs and have suffered losses reimbursable under that program in excess of the maximum federal grant amount.

(c) The State Department of Social Services may make a grant to those individuals and households equal to the difference between the federal grant awarded and federally eligible appraised loss, not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000) per individual or household.

(d) Application procedures established for the administration of this chapter shall conform to the procedures required in the Robert T. Stafford Disaster Relief and Emergency Assistance Act (P.L. 93-288, as amended by P.L. 106-390). The State Department of Social Services shall ensure that applicants for relief under this chapter have exhausted all other available means of seeking relief for disaster damage prior to receiving any grants pursuant to this chapter.

(e) Application procedures utilized in the administration of this chapter shall be subject to the following criteria:

(1) All applications, forms, and other written materials presented to persons seeking assistance shall be available in English and in the same language as that used by the major non-English-speaking group within the disaster area.

(2) Bilingual staff who reflect the demographics of the disaster area shall be available to applicants.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 350, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

13601.

There is hereby created in the State Treasury the California Individual and Family Supplemental Grant Fund. Moneys in the fund shall be available to pay claims from individuals and families for losses or damages occurring during the incident period of a Presidential disaster declaration for individual assistance. Any moneys appropriated to the fund by the Legislature shall be allocated to the State Department of Social Services to provide supplemental individual and family grant assistance for unmet needs. The funds shall not be used to fulfill matching fund requirements for federal disaster assistance, but shall be used to supplement the federal assistance to individuals and households program under Section 5174 of Title 42 of the United States Code. Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, moneys in this fund are continuously appropriated, without regard to fiscal years, for the purpose of making grants pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 350, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5.9. Enhanced Services for Asylees and Vulnerable Noncitizens [13650. - 13654.]

13650.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(1) Vulnerable noncitizens, asylees, and refugees are important to the fabric of our society.

(2) Regardless of their legal distinctions, noncitizens face many of the same challenges integrating into the state and are often living in the same communities.

(3) Refugees, asylees, and other noncitizens are granted different services due to the legal distinction of when they were identified, with refugees often being identified in the country of origin and asylees in the country of arrival.

(4) Between 2017 and 2019, the number of applicants granted asylum increased from 26,199 applicants to 46,508 applicants, representing a 56-percent increase. In 2019 alone, California was the settlement state for 34 percent of all new asylees, which was the highest rate of all states.

(5) Research indicates that while individuals granted asylum in this state are given eligibility to a wide range of benefits, most asylees do not get these benefits due to the lack of case management services and assistance in navigating the social safety net and health care systems.

(6) The state-funded Trafficking and Crime Victim Assistance Program (TCVAP) provides critical benefits and services to noncitizen victims of human
 trafficking, domestic violence, and other serious crimes. TCVAP benefits and services mirror those that are available to refugees after initial resettlement. These vulnerable noncitizens would benefit from initial case management services.

(7) Studies show that with proper case management support, noncitizens are better able to secure the benefits for which they are eligible, and find employment and bring immense contributions to the economy.

(b) The Enhanced Services for Asylees and Vulnerable Noncitizens (ESAVN) is hereby established to provide resettlement services for persons who are currently residing in California and who are granted asylum by the United States Attorney General or the United States Secretary of Homeland Security pursuant to Section 1158 of Title 8
 of the United States Code or who are eligible for assistance and services under Section 13283.

(c) For purposes of this chapter, a “vulnerable noncitizen” is defined as any individual who would be eligible for services under Section 13283.

(d) Grants or contracts awarded pursuant to this section shall be executed only with nonprofit organizations that meet the requirements set forth either in Section 501(c)(3) or 501(c)(5) of the Internal Revenue Code or in Section 23701d of the Revenue and Taxation Code and have at least three years of experience with both of the following:

(1) Providing case management services, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 13651.

(2) Providing culturally and linguistically appropriate services.

(e) The department shall require qualified nonprofit organizations awarded contracts or grants pursuant to this section to report, monitor, or audit the services provided, as determined by the department.

(f) Funds allocated for these services may also be used to conduct a formal evaluation of the services provided by a qualified entity, as determined by the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 451, Sec. 6.   (AB 1318)   Effective October 7, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

13651.

(a) The program shall provide culturally appropriate and responsive case management services for asylees and vulnerable noncitizens for up to 90 days within the first year following the grant of asylum or after having been deemed eligible for services under Section 13283.

(b) Case management services under the program shall include assistance in identifying and applying for all benefits to which the person is legally entitled, including cultural orientation and integration programs, support in accessing and navigating the public benefits and health care systems, community connection and relationship building, English language instruction, and employment training, job placement assistance, and professional recredentialing and licensing
 application assistance.

(c) The department shall, in collaboration with service providers, determine outcome metrics to define program success.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 85, Sec. 60.   (AB 135)   Effective July 16, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

13652.

Notwithstanding any other law:

(a) Contracts or grants awarded pursuant to this chapter shall be exempt from the personal services contracting requirements of Article 4 (commencing with Section 19130) of Chapter 5 of Part 2 of Division 5 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(b) Contracts or grants awarded pursuant to this chapter shall be exempt from the Public Contract Code and the State Contracting Manual, and shall not be subject to the approval of the Department of General Services.

(c) The client information and records of legal services provided pursuant to this chapter shall be
 subject to the requirements of Section 10850 and shall be exempt from inspection under the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code).

(d) The state shall be immune from any liability resulting from the implementation of this chapter.

(e) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the department may implement, interpret, or make specific this chapter without taking regulatory action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 28, Sec. 161.   (SB 1380)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

13653.

The Legislature finds and declares that this chapter is a state law that may provide assistance and services for undocumented persons within the meaning of subsection (d) of Section 1621 of Title 8 of the United States Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 85, Sec. 60.   (AB 135)   Effective July 16, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

13654.

This chapter shall be implemented only to the extent that funds are appropriated for this purpose in the annual Budget Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 85, Sec. 60.   (AB 135)   Effective July 16, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Homeless Youth Emergency Service Pilot Projects [13700. - 13703.]

13700.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) There are homeless minors living on the streets of major urban centers in this state without adequate food, shelter, health care, or financial support. 

(b) Many of these homeless youth in these urban centers come from out-of-city or out-of-county locations. 

(c) The homeless child, in many instances, has a history of physical or sexual abuse at home, and of having been rejected or forced out of the parental home. 

(d) While living on the streets, these youth fall prey to drug abuse, prostitution, and other illegal activities. 

(e) Local public agencies are unable to provide these youth with an adequate level or range of remedial services. 

(f) These homeless minors are urgently in need of specialized services to locate them, to assist them with their immediate survival needs, and to address their long-term need to reunite with their parents or find a suitable home. 

(g) Two homeless youth emergency service pilot programs, one in the City of Los Angeles, and one in the City and County of San Francisco, have demonstrated the need for ongoing programs to meet the needs of homeless minors and the effectiveness of these programs in meeting these needs. 

The purpose of this chapter is therefore to maintain one homeless youth emergency project in the County of Los Angeles and one in the City and County of San Francisco, where the problem is most acute, and to the extent funds are appropriated in the Budget Act of 1991, to establish additional homeless youth emergency service pilot projects pursuant to this chapter. It is the further purpose of this chapter to examine the condition of homeless youth in major urban areas of this state with populations of 500,000 or more, as well as other urban, suburban, and rural areas, and develop a profile of homeless youth in terms of background and available services, in order to locate these youth, to provide for their emergency survival needs, and to assist them in reunification with their parents or in finding a suitable home.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1091, Sec. 164.)
-------------------------------------------

13700.5.

For purposes of this chapter, “office” means the Office of Criminal Justice Planning.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1445, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

13701.

Each homeless youth project established under this chapter shall provide services which shall include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(a) Food and access to an overnight shelter.

(b) Counseling to address immediate emotional crises or problems.

(c) Outreach services to locate homeless youth and link them with services, and drop-in facilities to make the services accessible to the street population. 

(d) Screening for basic health needs and referral to public and private agencies for health care.

(e) Linkage to other services offered by public and private agencies.

(f) Long-term stabilization planning so that the youth may be returned to the parental home under circumstances favoring long-term reunification with the family, or so that the youth can be suitably placed in a situation outside the family when family reunification is not possible.

(g) Followup services to ensure that the return to the family or the placement outside the family is stable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 288, Sec. 2.   Effective July 7, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

13703.

(a) One homeless youth emergency service project shall be established in the County of Los Angeles and one shall be established in the City and County of San Francisco. One homeless youth emergency service project shall also be established in the County of San Diego and one shall be established in the County of Santa Clara. Each project may have one central location or may have more than one location in the service area in order to serve effectively the area population of homeless youth. Each project shall be operated by an agency in accordance with the grant award agreement with the office.

(b) The office shall prepare and disseminate a request for proposals for grantees under this chapter by February 15, 1986. The office shall enter into grant award agreements, and the operation of pilot projects shall begin, not later than June 1, 1986. With respect to projects to be established in the County of San Diego and the County of Santa Clara, the office shall prepare and disseminate a request for proposals for grantees under this chapter by March 31, 1992. The office shall enter into grant award agreements and the operation of these projects shall begin not later than July 1, 1992.

(c) An agency eligible to apply for funds under this chapter and to operate a homeless youth emergency service project shall be a private, nonprofit agency with a demonstrated record of success in the delivery of services to homeless youth. The agency selected for each project shall demonstrate the ability to provide each of the services described in Section 13701, either directly or under subcontract with a competent provider. Preference shall be given to agencies that demonstrate a history of coordination with other public and private agencies in the service region that provide services to homeless youth. Preference shall also be given to agencies that will involve a network of youth-serving agencies in the delivery of services to homeless youth under this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1396, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6.2. Foster Care Social Security and Supplemental Security Income Assistance Program [13750. - 13757.]

13750.

This chapter shall be known, and may be cited, as the Foster Care Social Security and Supplemental Security Income Assistance Program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 641, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

13752.

The State Department of Social Services shall convene a workgroup comprised of the County Welfare Directors Association, county welfare directors, child advocacy organizations, current and former foster youth and other relevant stakeholders, as determined by the department, to develop best practice guidelines for county welfare departments to assist children residing in the state’s or a county’s custody who are eligible for benefits under Title II of the federal Social Security Act, pursuant to Section 402 et seq. of Title 42 of the United States Code (social security benefits) and Title XVI of the Social Security Act, pursuant to Section 1381 of Title 42 of the United States Code (supplemental security income benefits) in receiving all federal benefits for which they are eligible. The guidelines shall be established by December 31, 2006, and shall include, but not be limited to, establishing procedures for all of the following:

(a) Determining the time and manner for conducting disability screenings for children in the custody of the county who may be eligible for social security or Supplemental Security Income/State Supplementary Payment (SSI/SSP) benefits.

(b) Assisting in the application process for social security and SSI/SSP benefits for each child who, pursuant to the disability screening, is likely to be determined eligible for benefits.

(c) Requesting reconsideration and appealing adverse decisions where appropriate.

(d) Informing parents and caretakers, at the time the child leaves foster care, of potential eligibility for social security or SSI/SSP benefits for any child not receiving benefits but who may be eligible upon application for those benefits.

(e) Maximizing the amount of federal benefits received for the current maintenance of children in the county’s custody.

(f) Informing foster youth of their rights and responsibilities for the continued receipt of SSI benefits, the sources of assistance that may be available for resolving problems youth may have with the receipt of SSI benefits, and the process for transferring accumulated SSI benefits.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 641, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

13753.

(a) When a foster youth is receiving payments from the federal Social Security Administration, the county shall do all of the following at least six months before the youth’s 18th birthday:

(1) Provide information to the youth regarding the federal requirement that the youth establish continuing disability as an adult, if necessary, in order for SSI benefits to continue beyond their 18th birthday.

(2) Provide information to the youth regarding the process for becoming their own payee and steps necessary to maintain the federal Social Security Administration benefits, or designating an appropriate representative payee if benefits continue beyond their 18th birthday, and regarding any federal Social
 Security Administration benefits that have accumulated on their behalf. The county shall also provide information about the effect, if any, the youth’s foster care benefits may have on the amount of the youth’s SSI payments.

(3) Assist the youth, as appropriate, in fulfilling the requirements of paragraphs (1) and (2).

(b) Upon the youth attaining 18 years of age, if the youth elects to remain in foster care as a nonminor dependent, the county shall carry out the requirements of subdivision (c) of Section 13754.

(c) The department shall disseminate information to counties to support implementation of this section and shall distribute these materials to county placing agencies prior to implementation of this section.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 50, Sec. 63) by Stats. 2024, Ch. 623, Sec. 2.   (AB 2906)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

13754.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that this section shall not be interpreted to preclude a nonminor dependent from accessing the same benefits, services, and supports, and exercise the same choices available to all dependents. It is further the intent of the Legislature that nonminor dependents who receive federal Social Security Administration benefits can serve as their own payee, if it is determined that the nonminor dependent satisfies the criteria established by the federal Social Security Administration, and should be assisted in receiving direct payment by the county placing agency. It is further the intent of the Legislature that individuals who have had their eligibility for federal Supplemental Security Income benefits established pursuant to Section 13757 be able to maintain that eligibility even when they remain
 in the state’s care as a nonminor dependent. In order to facilitate this, it is the intent of the Legislature that the county placing agency ensure that the youth receives an SSI payment during at least 1 month of each 12-month period while the youth is a nonminor dependent. It is further the intent of the Legislature that the county placing agency supplement the SSI payment that a youth receives during this 1-month period with nonfederal AFDC-FC benefits.

(b) (1) The county shall apply to be appointed representative payee on behalf of a child beneficiary in its custody when no other appropriate party is available to serve.

(2) Before applying to be appointed representative payee pursuant to paragraph (1), the county shall send a written notice of the intent to be appointed to the child’s counsel and parents or legal guardians.

(c) In consultation with the nonminor dependent, the county shall identify an appropriate representative payee, which may include the nonminor dependent, a trusted adult, or the county. For a nonminor dependent who is receiving federal Social Security Administration benefits the county shall do all of the following:

(1) (A) If the nonminor dependent requests a representative payee that is not the county, the county shall assist the nonminor dependent in requesting a change of payee to the federal Social Security Administration. The county shall assist the nonminor dependent or the nonminor dependent’s representative payee in understanding any restrictions on the use of federal Social Security Administration funds and communicating any changes in the nonminor dependent’s foster care case to the federal Social Security Administration if those changes would affect
 the nonminor dependent’s eligibility for, or the amount of, benefits from the federal Social Security Administration.

(B) The county shall assist the nonminor dependent in taking the necessary steps to establish continuing disability as an adult, including, but not limited to, steps the nonminor dependent will need to take to gather and submit relevant records to the federal Social Security Administration and requesting an appeal, as needed. The county shall provide the nonminor dependent with any information maintained in the nonminor dependent’s case file that may assist them in establishing and maintaining federal Social Security Administration benefits, upon request of the nonminor dependent. The county shall also provide information to the nonminor dependent on how to access any known legal representation and advocacy organizations or entities for further assistance and, if the nonminor dependent requests to obtain a federal Social
 Security Administration advocate, shall assist the nonminor dependent in communicating and coordinating with that advocate.

(2) If the nonminor dependent selects the county as their representative payee, the county shall follow the procedures described in Section 13757 to maintain eligibility for SSI payments. The county shall advise the nonminor dependent on an annual basis of the nonminor dependent’s right to request a different representative payee and document in the nonminor dependent’s transitional independent living case plan steps the nonminor dependent can take to become their own payee by 21 years of age. If the nonminor dependent exits care prior to attaining 21 years of age, the county shall provide information to the nonminor dependent of the steps the nonminor dependent will need to take to submit a change of payee request to the federal Social Security Administration and shall provide the necessary assistance to ensure that the
 nonminor dependent receives SSI payments as soon as possible after exiting care.

(3) To support nonminor dependents in establishing and maintaining federal Social Security Administration benefits eligibility pursuant to this subdivision, the county may contract with legal services organizations or other entities to provide extended legal representation on behalf of children or nonminor dependents in foster care.

(d) In its capacity as representative payee, the county shall do all of the following:
